Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 2 Dimensions and Weight of Vehicles and Loads
32-6-27.
Enforcement of load limitations.

Any person who violates the load limitation provisions of Code Section 32-6-26 shall be conclusively presumed to have damaged the public roads, including bridges, of this state by reason of such overloading and shall recompense the state for such damage in accordance with the following schedule:

Five cents per pound for all excess weight over the allowed weight limitations, including any applicable variances;

For the following vehicles, damages for excess weight shall be assessed at 125 percent times the rate imposed on offending vehicles operating without a permit:

Where a vehicle is authorized to exceed the weight limitations of Code Section 32-6-26 by a permit issued pursuant to Code Section 32-6-28, the term “excess weight” means that weight which exceeds the weight allowed by such permit; and

Where a vehicle is authorized to exceed the weight limitations of Code Section 32-6-26 by a permit issued pursuant to Code Section 32-6-28 as a superload permit or superload plus permit, the term “excess weight” means:

Any single axle weight which exceeds any single axle weight allowed by such permit; and

All weight greater than 150,000 pounds when the gross weight of the vehicle and load exceeds the gross weight allowed by such permit or when any axle spacing is less than that specified by such permit; or

Any vehicle that utilizes idle reduction technology shall have any penalty for violating Code Section 32-6-26, except for subsections (f) and (h), calculated by reducing from the actual gross weight, single axle weight, tandem axle weight, or the allowed weight on any group of two or more axles the manufacturer’s certified weight of the idle reducing technology or 550 pounds, whichever is less. The operator of the vehicle shall present written certification from the manufacturer specifying the weight of the idle reducing technology and demonstrate that the idle reducing technology is fully functional at all times when so requested by any law enforcement officer or employee of the Department of Public Safety.

(a.1) (1) (A)

The Department of Public Safety is authorized to issue a citation to the owner or operator of any vehicle in violation of a maximum weight limit on a county road which is a designated local truck route under subsection (f) of Code Section 32-6-26 and for which signs have been placed and maintained as required under paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 32-6-50.

The schedules listed in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall apply separately to:

The excess weight of the gross load; and

The sum of the excess weight or weights of any axle or axles;

provided, however, that where both gross load and axle weight limits are exceeded, the owner or operator shall be required to recompense the state only for the largest of the money damages imposed under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection.

Within 30 days after the issuance of the citation, the owner or operator of any offending vehicle shall pay the amount of the assessment to the Department of Public Safety or request an administrative determination of the amount and validity of the assessment.

The right to an administrative determination of the amount and validity of the assessment shall be granted only to the owner or operator of an offending vehicle.

The party requesting an administrative determination of the amount and validity of the assessment shall deposit the amount of the assessment with the Department of Public Safety, within the time permitted to request such determination, before the determination will be granted. In the event the assessment is determined to be erroneous, the Department of Public Safety shall make prompt refund of any overpayment after receipt of a final decision making such determination.

If an administrative hearing is requested, it shall be held in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and the rules and regulations of the Department of Public Safety. The scope of any such hearing shall be limited to a determination of:

The weight of the offending vehicle;

The maximum weight allowed by law on the roadway upon which the offending vehicle was operated; and

Whether the operator had in his or her actual possession a valid oversize or overweight permit issued by the Department of Transportation allowing the vehicle to operate in excess of the maximum weight otherwise allowed by law on the roadway upon which the offending vehicle was operated.

Any person who has exhausted all administrative remedies available within the Department of Public Safety and who is aggrieved by a final order of the Department of Public Safety is entitled to judicial review in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50.

If a party requests an administrative determination of the amount and validity of the assessment and fails to appear without first obtaining permission from the administrative law judge or does not withdraw the request in writing no less than five days in advance of a scheduled hearing, the party shall be deemed in default and the citation shall be affirmed by operation of law. The party shall be deemed to owe the sum of $75.00 in addition to the amount due on the citation, which sum shall represent hearing costs.

All moneys collected in accordance with this Code section shall be disposed of as follows:

All moneys collected for violations of the weight limitations imposed by this article shall be remitted to the general fund of the state treasury;

All moneys collected for violations of the height, width, or length limitations imposed by this article, after the appropriate statutory deductions, shall be retained by the governing authority of the county wherein the violation occurred for deposit in the general treasury of said county;

Hearing costs imposed pursuant to paragraph (6) of subsection (c) of this Code section shall be retained by the Department of Public Safety;

Reissuance fees imposed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection (g) of this Code section shall be retained by the Department of Revenue; and

Restoration fees imposed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (i) of this Code section shall be retained by the Department of Revenue.

Any owner or operator of a vehicle which is operated on the public roads of this state in violation of the weight limitations provided in this article shall be required, in addition to paying the moneys provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, to unload all gross weight in excess of 6,000 pounds over the legal weight limit at the closest reasonable location.

Any person authorized by law to enforce this article may seize the offending vehicle of an owner who fails or whose operator fails to pay the moneys prescribed in subsection (a) of this Code section and hold such vehicle until the prescribed moneys are paid. If the offending vehicle is not registered in this state, any person authorized by law to enforce this article may seize any vehicle owned or operated by an owner who fails or whose operator fails to pay the moneys prescribed in subsection (a) of this Code section and hold such vehicle until the prescribed moneys are paid. Any person seizing a vehicle under this subsection or subsection (e) of this Code section may, when necessary, store the vehicle; and the owner thereof shall be responsible for all reasonable storage charges thereon. When any vehicle is seized, held, unloaded, or partially unloaded under these subsections, the load or any part thereof shall be removed or cared for by the owner or operator of the vehicle without any liability on the part of the authorized person or of the state or any political subdivision because of damage to or loss of such load or any part thereof.

Whenever any person, firm, or corporation violates this article and becomes indebted to the Department of Public Safety because of such violations and fails within 30 days of the date of issuance of the overweight assessment citation either to pay the assessment or appeal to the Department of Public Safety for administrative review, as provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section, such assessment shall become a lien upon the overweight motor vehicle so found to be in violation, which lien shall be superior to all liens except liens for taxes or perfected security interests established before the debt to the Department of Public Safety was created.

Whenever any person, firm, or corporation requests an administrative review, it shall be held in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.” In the event that the administrative law judge finds in favor of the Department of Public Safety, the person, firm, or corporation shall pay the assessment within 30 days after that decision becomes final or, if judicial review is had in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, then within 30 days after final judicial review is terminated. If the person, firm, or corporation fails to pay the assessment within 30 days, such assessment shall become a lien as provided for under paragraph (1) of this subsection.

The Department of Public Safety shall perfect the lien created under this subsection by sending notice thereof on a notice designated by the commissioner of public safety, by first-class mail or by statutory overnight delivery, to the owner and all holders of liens and security interests shown on the records of the Department of Revenue maintained pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 40. Upon receipt of notice from the Department of Public Safety, the holder of the certificate of title shall surrender same to the state revenue commissioner for issuance of a replacement certificate of title bearing the lien of the department unless the assessment is paid within 30 days of the receipt of notice. The Department of Revenue may append the lien to its records, notwithstanding the failure of the holder of the certificate of title to surrender said certificate as required by this paragraph.

Upon issuance of a title bearing the lien of the Department of Public Safety, or the appending of the lien to the records of the Department of Revenue, the owner of the vehicle or the holder of any security interest or lien shown in the records of the Department of Revenue may satisfy such lien by payment of the amount of the assessment, including hearing costs, if any, and payment of a reissuance fee of $100.00. Upon receipt of such amount, the Department of Public Safety shall release its lien and the Department of Revenue shall issue a new title without the lien.

The Department of Public Safety, in seeking to foreclose its lien on the motor vehicle arising out of an overweight motor vehicle citation assessed under this article, may seek an immediate writ of possession from the court before whom the petition is filed, if the petition contains a statement of facts, under oath, by the Department of Public Safety, its agents, its officers, or attorney setting forth the basis of the petitioner’s claim and sufficient grounds for issuance of an immediate writ of possession.

The Department of Public Safety shall allege under oath specific facts sufficient to show that it is within the power of the defendant to conceal, encumber, convert, convey, or remove from the jurisdiction of the court the property which is the subject matter of the petition.

The court before whom the petition is pending shall issue a writ for immediate possession, upon finding that the petitioner has complied with paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection. If the petitioner is found not to have made sufficient showing to obtain an immediate writ of possession, the court may, nevertheless, treat the petition as one being filed under Code Section 44-14-231 and proceed accordingly.

When an immediate writ of possession has been granted, the Department of Public Safety shall proceed against the defendant in the same manner as provided for in Code Sections 44-14-265 through 44-14-269.

Whenever any person, firm, or corporation violates this article and fails within 30 days of the date of issuance of the overweight assessment citation either to pay the assessment or appeal to the Department of Public Safety for an administrative review as provided for under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” the Department of Revenue may act to suspend the motor vehicle registration of the vehicle involved. However, if the person, firm, or corporation requests an administrative review, the Department of Revenue shall act to suspend the registration only after the issuance of a final decision favorable to the Department of Public Safety and the requisite failure of the person, firm, or corporation to pay the assessment. Upon such failure to pay the assessment, the Department of Revenue shall send a letter to the owner of such motor vehicle notifying the owner of the suspension of the motor vehicle registration issued to the motor vehicle involved in the overweight assessment citation. Upon complying with this subsection by paying the overdue assessment and upon submitting proof of compliance and paying a $10.00 restoration fee to the Department of Revenue, the state revenue commissioner shall reinstate any motor vehicle registration suspended under this subsection. In cases where the motor vehicle registration has been suspended under this subsection for a second or subsequent time during any two-year period, the Department of Revenue shall suspend the motor vehicle registration for a period of 60 days and thereafter until the owner submits proof of compliance with this subsection and pays the $150.00 restoration fee to the Department of Revenue.

Unless otherwise provided for in this Code section, notice of the effective date of the suspension of a motor vehicle registration occurs when the owner has actual knowledge or legal notice thereof, whichever first occurs. For the purposes of making any determination relating to the restoration of a suspended motor vehicle registration, no period of suspension shall be deemed to have begun until ten days after the mailing of the notice required in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

For the purposes of this subsection, except where otherwise provided, the mailing of a notice to a person at the name and address shown in records of the Department of Revenue maintained under Chapter 3 of Title 40 shall, with respect to the holders of liens and security interests, be presumptive evidence that such person received the required notice.

For the purposes of this subsection, except where otherwise provided, the mailing of a notice to a person or firm at the name and address shown on the overweight assessment citation shall, with respect to owners and operators of vehicles involved in an overweight assessment, be presumptive evidence that such person received the required notice.

The state revenue commissioner may suspend the motor vehicle registration of any offending vehicle for which payment of an overweight assessment is made by a check that is returned for any reason.

For the purposes of this subsection, where any provisions require the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Revenue to give notice to a person, which notice affects such person’s motor vehicle license plate, the mailing of such notice and the name and address shown on the notice of overdue assessment citation supplied by the Department of Public Safety, as required by this subsection, shall be presumptive evidence that such person received the required notice.

(B)

The Department of Public Safety is authorized to issue a warning to the owner or operator of any vehicle in violation of a maximum weight limit on a county road which is a designated local truck route under subsection (f) of Code Section 32-6-26 but for which signs have not been placed or maintained as required under paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 32-6-50 upon the first such violation and to issue a citation to such owner or operator for a subsequent such violation.

(2) (A)

The Department of Public Safety is authorized to issue a citation to the owner or operator of any vehicle in violation of a maximum weight limit on a bridge for which signs have been placed and maintained as required under paragraph (3) of Code Section 32-4-41 or subsection (a.1) of Code Section 32-4-91.

(B)

The Department of Public Safety is authorized to issue a warning to the owner or operator of any vehicle in violation of a maximum weight limit on a bridge but for which signs have not been placed or maintained as required under paragraph (3) of Code Section 32-4-41 or subsection (a.1) of Code Section 32-4-91 upon the first such violation and to issue a citation to such owner or operator for a subsequent such violation.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 83, § 3; Code 1933, § 95A-960, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 37; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1989, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 998, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 23; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1236, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1206, § 4; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, §§ 2-4, 2-5; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 32; Ga. L. 2003, p. 450, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 12-2/HB 501; Ga. L. 2005, p. 822, § 2/HB 279; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 32/SB 465; Ga. L. 2007, p. 237, § 2/HB 536; Ga. L. 2010, p. 442, § 2/HB 1174; Ga. L. 2011, p. 548, § 2/SB 54; Ga. L. 2017, p. 720, § 2/HB 328.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “550 pounds” for “400 pounds” near the end of the first sentence of paragraph (a)(3).

32-6-28.
Permits for excess weight and dimensions.

Generally.

The commissioner or an official of the department designated by the commissioner may, in his or her discretion, upon application in writing and good cause being shown therefor, issue a permit in writing authorizing the applicant to operate or move upon the state’s public roads a motor vehicle or combination of vehicles and loads whose weight, width, length, or height, or combination thereof, exceeds the maximum limit specified by law, provided that the load transported by such vehicle or vehicles is of such nature that it is a unit which cannot be readily dismantled or separated; and provided, further, that no permit shall be issued to any vehicle whose operation upon the public roads of this state threatens to unduly damage a road or any appurtenance thereto, except that the dismantling limitation specified in this Code section shall not apply to loads which consist of cotton, tobacco, concrete pipe, and plywood that do not exceed a width of nine feet or of round bales of hay that do not exceed a width of 11 feet and which are not moved on part of The Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways. However, vehicles transporting portable buildings and vehicles not exceeding 65 feet in length transporting boats on roads not a part of The Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways, regardless of whether the nature of such buildings or boats is such that they can be readily dismantled or separated, may exceed the lengths and widths established in this article, provided that a special permit for such purposes has been issued as provided in this Code section, but no such special permit shall be issued for a load exceeding 12 feet in width when such load may be readily dismantled or separated. A truck tractor and low boy type trailer may, after depositing its permitted load, return to its point of origin on the authorization of its original permit.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the commissioner or an official of the department designated by the commissioner may, in his or her discretion, upon application in writing and good cause being shown therefor, issue to a specific tow vehicle a permit in writing authorizing the applicant to operate or move upon the state’s public roads a motor vehicle or combination of vehicles and loads for transporting not more than two modular housing units or sectional housing units if the total weight, width, length, and height of the vehicle or combination of vehicles, including the load, does not exceed the limits specified in Code Sections 32-6-22 and 32-6-26. Permission to transport two modular housing units is only authorized when the modular unit transporter meets the minimum specifications contained in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph. No permit shall be issued to any vehicle or combination of vehicles whose operation upon the public roads of this state threatens the safety of others or threatens to damage unduly a road or any appurtenance thereto.

A modular unit transporter shall meet all requirements of the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration and all state safety requirements, rules, and regulations. The modular unit transporter shall be properly registered and have a proper, current license plate. At a minimum, the modular unit transporter shall:

Be constructed of 12 inch steel I beams doubled and welded together;

Have all axles equipped with brakes;

Have every floor joist on each modular section securely attached to the beams with lag bolts and washers, or lag bolts, washers, and cable winches; and

Have an overall length not to exceed 80 feet including the hitch.

Permits may be issued, on application to the department, to persons, firms, or corporations without specifying license plate numbers in order that such permits which are issued on an annual basis may be interchanged from vehicle to vehicle. The department is authorized to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations which are necessary or desirable to govern the issuance of such permits, provided that such rules and regulations are not in conflict with this title or other provisions of law.

Every such permit shall be carried in the vehicle or combination of vehicles to which it refers and shall be open to inspection by any police officer, state trooper, or authorized agent of the department.

The application for any such permit shall describe the type of permit applied for, as said types of permits are described in subsection (c) of this Code section. In addition, the application for a single-trip permit shall describe the points of departure and destination.

The commissioner or an official of the department designated by the commissioner is authorized to withhold such permit or, if such permit is issued, to establish seasonal or other time limitations within which the vehicles described may be operated on the public road indicated, or otherwise to limit or prescribe conditions of operation of such vehicles when necessary to ensure against undue damage to the road foundation, surfaces, or bridge structures, and to require such undertaking or other security as may be deemed necessary to compensate the state for any injury to any roadway or bridge structure.

For just cause, including, but not limited to, repeated and consistent past violations, the commissioner or an official of the department designated by the commissioner may refuse to issue or may cancel, suspend, or revoke the permit and any permit privileges of an applicant or permittee. The specific period of time of any suspension shall be determined by the department. In addition, any time the restrictions or conditions within which a permitted vehicle must be operated are violated, the permit may be immediately declared null and void.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to enforce the suspension of permits authorized in this Code section.

The department shall issue rules to establish a driver training and certification program for drivers of vehicles escorting oversize/overweight loads. Any driver operating a vehicle escorting an oversize/overweight load shall meet the training requirements and obtain certification under the rules issued by the department pursuant to this Code section. The rules may provide for reciprocity with other states having a similar program for escort certification. Certification credentials of the driver of an escort vehicle shall be carried in the escort vehicle and be readily available for inspection by law enforcement personnel or an authorized employee of the department. The department shall implement the vehicle escort driver training and certification program on or before July 1, 2010, and the requirements for training and certification shall be enforced beginning on January 1, 2011.

Permit holders shall be required to meet the following minimum insurance standards:

For loads where the gross vehicle weight is less than or equal to 10,000 pounds:

For bodily injury a limit of $50,000.00 per person for injury or death as a result of any one occurrence; and

For property damage a limit of $50,000.00 for damage to property of others in any one occurrence; or

For commercial motor carriers where the gross vehicle weight is greater than 10,000 pounds:

For bodily injury a minimum of $300,000.00 for each person and $1 million for multiple persons for injury or death as a result of any one occurrence; and

For property damage a minimum of $1 million for damage to property of others in any one occurrence.

Duration and limits of permits.

Annual permit. The commissioner or an official of the department designated by the commissioner may, pursuant to this Code section, issue an annual permit which shall permit a vehicle to be operated on the public roads of this state for 12 months from the date the permit is issued even though the vehicle or its load exceeds the maximum limits specified in this article. However, except as specified in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an annual permit shall not authorize the operation of a vehicle:

Whose total gross weight exceeds 100,000 pounds;

Whose single axle weight exceeds 25,000 pounds;

Whose total load length exceeds 100 feet;

Whose total width exceeds 102 inches or whose load width exceeds 144 inches; or

Whose height exceeds 14 feet and six inches.

Annual permit plus. Vehicles and loads that meet the requirements for an annual permit may apply for a special annual permit to carry wider loads on the NHS. The wider load limits shall be a maximum of 14 feet wide from the base of the load to a point 10 feet above the pavement and 14 feet and eight inches for the upper portion of the load.

Annual commercial wrecker emergency tow permit. Pursuant to this Code section, the commissioner may issue an annual permit for vehicles towing disabled, damaged, abandoned, or wrecked commercial vehicles, including combination vehicles, even though such wrecker or its load exceeds the maximum limits specified in this article. An annual commercial wrecker emergency tow permit shall not authorize the operation of a vehicle:

Whose single axle weight exceeds 25,000 pounds;

Whose load on one tandem axle exceeds 50,000 pounds and whose load on any secondary tandem axle exceeds 38,000 pounds; or

Whose total load length exceeds 125 feet.

Six-month permit. Six-month permits may be issued for loads of tobacco or unginned cotton the widths of which do not exceed nine feet, provided that such loads shall not be operated on The Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways.

Single trip. Pursuant to this Code section, the commissioner may issue a single-trip permit to any vehicle or load allowed by federal law.

Multitrip. Pursuant to this Code section, the commissioner may issue a multitrip permit to any vehicle or load allowed by federal law. A multitrip permit authorizes the permitted load to return to its original destination on the same permit, if done so within ten days, with the same vehicle configuration, and following the same route, unless otherwise specified by the department. A multitrip permit authorizes unlimited permitted loads on the same permit, if done so within the allowable ten days, with the same vehicle configuration, and following the same route.

Fees. The department may promulgate rules and regulations concerning the issuance of permits and charge a fee for the issuance thereof as follows:

Annual. Charges for the issuance of annual permits shall be $150.00 per permit.

Annual permit plus. Charges for the issuance of annual permits plus shall be $500.00 per permit.

Annual commercial wrecker emergency tow permit. Charges for the issuance of annual commercial wrecker emergency tow permits shall be $500.00 per permit.

Six months. The charges for the issuance of six-month permits for loads of tobacco or unginned cotton shall be $25.00 per permit.

Single trip. Charges for the issuance of single-trip permits shall be as follows:

Any load not greater than 16 feet wide, not greater than 16 feet high, and not weighing more than 150,000 pounds or any load greater than 100 feet long which does not exceed the maximum width, height, and weight limits specified by this subparagraph $ 30.00 (B) Any load having a width, height, or weight exceeding the maximum limit therefor specified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and not weighing more than 180,000 pounds 125.00 Superload permit. (C) Any load having a weight exceeding the maximum limit therefor specified in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph 500.00 Superload plus permit.

Click to view

Multitrip. Charges for the issuance of multitrip permits shall be $100.00 for any load not greater than 16 feet wide, not greater than 16 feet high, and not weighing more than 150,000 pounds or any load greater than 100 feet long which does not exceed the maximum width, height, and weight limits specified by this paragraph.

Notwithstanding any provision of Code Section 48-2-17 to the contrary, all fees collected in accordance with this Code section shall be paid to the treasurer of the department to help defray the expenses of enforcing the limitations set forth in this article and may also be used for public road maintenance purposes in addition to any sums appropriated therefor to the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 30, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 637, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 43, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 462, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 356, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 95A-961, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 38; Ga. L. 1975, p. 400, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 439, § 4; Ga. L. 1980, p. 576, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1798, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 471, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 655, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 846, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 987, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2467, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 348, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 32; Ga. L. 1995, p. 155, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1010, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1512, § 3A; Ga. L. 1999, p. 567, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 32; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1654, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1126, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 2010, p. 442, § 3/HB 1174; Ga. L. 2011, p. 548, §§ 3, 4/SB 54; Ga. L. 2012, p. 732, § 1/HB 835; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 32/HB 942; Ga. L. 2013, p. 738, § 1/SB 218.

Cross references.

License fees for different weight categories of vehicles, §

40-2-151

.

32-6-29.
Responsibility of the Department of Transportation; responsibility of the Department of Public Safety.

The Department of Transportation shall be responsible for rules and regulations relating to size and weight limits and issuance of permits under this article.

The Department of Transportation shall not, however, employ any law enforcement officers or agents except as may be specifically authorized by other laws. Law enforcement responsibility for enforcement of this article shall be in the Department of Public Safety.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 1122, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 193, § 2; Code 1933, § 95A-962, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 40; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1500, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1989, § 3; Ga. L. 1979, p. 814, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 32; Ga. L. 1993, p. 366, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 2-6; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1199, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 12-3/HB 501.

32-6-30.
Stopping vehicles for purposes of weighing, measuring, or inspecting; reports of violations; refusal to stop.

Any law enforcement officer or employee of the Department of Public Safety to whom law enforcement authority has been designated who observes a motor vehicle being operated upon a public road of the state and who has reason to believe that: (1) Any provision of this article is being violated; (2) The vehicle is improperly licensed in violation of Code Sections 40-2-150 through 40-2-162; or (3) A fuel tax registration card is not being carried or that a proper distinguishing identification marker is not affixed to the vehicle in violation of Code Section 48-9-39 is authorized to stop such vehicle and weigh, measure, or inspect the same. Violations of such licensing or fuel tax registration and identification requirements shall be reported to the Department of Revenue.

If the operator of the vehicle shall refuse to stop upon proper order as directed by a person authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section to stop, weigh, measure, or inspect the vehicle or its load, the operator shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $200.00. The operator shall have the right to post an appropriate bond, which shall not exceed $400.00, when any law enforcement officer or employee of the Department of Public Safety authorized to enforce this article apprehends said operator for any violation of this article.

In addition, the operator’s driver’s license or nonresident’s driving privilege may be suspended for a period of not more than 90 days by the Department of Driver Services upon satisfactory proof of said refusal to stop or drive the vehicle upon the scales. Each person who shall apply for a Georgia driver’s license, or for nonresident driving privileges, or for a renewal of same thereby consents to stop such vehicle for inspection or to drive such vehicle upon scales whenever so ordered by a law enforcement official or authorized employee of the Department of Public Safety.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 1122, § 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 193, §§ 1, 3; Code 1933, § 95A-963, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 2-7; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1074, § 5; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 12-4/HB 501; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 32/SB 103.

Cross references.

General duty of Georgia State Patrol to check motor vehicles for excess load, §

35-2-33

.

Stopping of motor vehicles for lack of proper equipment or for other safety violations, §

40-8-200

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, “Code Sections 40-2-150 through 40-2-162; or” was substituted for “Code Section 40-2-150 through Code Section 40-2-162; or” in paragraph (a)(2) (now item (a)(2)).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 1074, § 8, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall not abate any prosecution, punishment, penalty, administrative proceedings or remedies, or civil action related to any violation of law committed prior to the effective date of this Act.” The effective date of Ga. L. 2002, p. 1074 was July 1, 2002.

32-6-31.
Construction of Code Sections 32-1-10, 32-6-26, 32-6-27, and 32-6-29.

The provisions of Code Sections 32-1-10, 32-6-26, 32-6-27, and 32-6-29 shall not, and shall not be construed to, modify, change, or diminish any power or duty held by any other law enforcement unit, enforcement officer, or peace officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1989, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 32; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 32.